Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5619YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2124 Section 1. Section 256.9, subsection 11, Code 2026, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 11. a. Approve, coordinate, and supervise the use of 4 electronic data and information processing by school districts, 5 area education agencies, and merged areas, including the 6 procurement or development of a single, comprehensive, 7 statewide, data collection system that is required to be used 8 by all school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, and area 9 education agencies. 10 b. The data collection system described in paragraph âaâ 11 must satisfy all of the following requirements: 12 (1) Be designed for the purpose of establishing 13 standardized electronic data collections and reporting 14 protocols that facilitate compliance with state and federal 15 reporting requirements. 16 (2) Improve school-to-school and district-to-district 17 information exchanges. 18 (3) Maintain the confidentiality of student and staff data. 19 (4) Provide for the electronic transfer of individual 20 student records between attendance centers, school districts, 21 accredited nonpublic schools, area education agencies, 22 postsecondary institutions, merged areas, and the department. 23 (5) (a) Be designed to ensure compatibility with any 24 student information system utilized by school districts, 25 accredited nonpublic schools, or area education agencies. 26 (b) The developer of the software must allow a school 27 district, accredited nonpublic school, or area education agency 28 to purchase a student information system from the developer 29 that maintains a shared database architecture with the data 30 collection system. 31 (6) Validate data for accuracy prior to a school district, 32 accredited nonpublic school, or area education agency 33 submitting the data to the department. 34 (7) Allow the department, school districts, accredited 35 -1- LSB 5619YH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2124 nonpublic schools, and area education agencies to communicate 1 regarding state reporting within the data collection system. 2 (8) Be hosted by the developer of the software to reduce 3 the burden on the department, school districts, accredited 4 nonpublic schools, and area education agencies associated with 5 maintaining the data collection system. 6 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ MODERNIZATION OF 7 ELECTRONIC SYSTEMS. 8 1. The department of education shall modernize the 9 departmentâs electronic systems and procedures in order to 10 ensure all of the following: 11 a. The proper disbursement of moneys in a timely manner by 12 increasing the ease and frequency of reporting submissions and 13 collections throughout the school year. 14 b. That the departmentâs systems are able to communicate 15 with other state agencies, and with school districts, nonpublic 16 schools, charter schools, and innovation zone schools, to 17 better identify needs for students and prepare students for the 18 future workforce. 19 2. The modernization described in subsection 1 must include 20 the deployment of a portal, on or before July 1, 2027, which 21 satisfies all of the following requirements: 22 a. Allows school districts, nonpublic schools, charter 23 schools, and innovation zone schools to do all of the 24 following: 25 (1) Validate the prior submission of data to the department. 26 (2) Perform a cross-district enrollment check prior to the 27 submission of information. 28 (3) Embed the communication tools between the department 29 and other school districts, nonpublic schools, charter schools, 30 and innovation zone schools. 31 b. Provides school districts, nonpublic schools, charter 32 schools, and innovation zone schools with access to a data 33 dictionary that updates automatically. 34 c. Includes a calendar with key dates. 35 -2- LSB 5619YH (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 3 H.F. 2124 d. Is hosted by the developer of the software to reduce 1 the burden on the department associated with maintaining the 2 portal. 3